California, session 20252026, AB2536.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 19605 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:19605. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the board may authorize an association licensed to conduct a racing meeting in the northern zone to operate a satellite wagering facility for wagering on races conducted in the northern zone at its racetrack inclosure subject to all of the conditions specified in Section 19605.3, and may authorize an association licensed to conduct a racing meeting in the central or southern zone to operate a satellite wagering facility for wagering on races conducted in the central or southern zone at its racetrack inclosure subject to the conditions specified in subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, of Section 19605.3 and the conditions and limitations set forth in Section 19605.6.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a satellite wagering facility, except a facility that is located at a track where live racing is conducted, shall not be located within 20 miles of any existing satellite wagering facility or of any track where a racing association conducts a live racing meeting. However, a racing association or any existing satellite wagering facility may waive the prohibition contained in this subdivision and may consent to the location of another satellite wagering facility within 20 miles of the facility or track.(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the Department of Food and Agriculture may approve not more than two three satellite wagering facilities that are licensed jointly to the 1a District Agricultural Association and the 5th District Agricultural Association and that are located on the fairgrounds of the 1a District Agricultural Association or within the boundaries of the City and County of San Francisco. Notwithstanding Section 19605.1, a satellite wagering facility may be located on property leased to one or both fairs. Notwithstanding any other law, the fairs may contract for the operation and management of a satellite wagering facility with an individual racing association or a partnership, joint venture, or other affiliation of two or more racing associations or fairs that are licensed to conduct thoroughbred meetings or simulcast wagering in the state.(d) Subdivision (b) does not prohibit the location of satellite wagering facilities within 20 miles of any existing or proposed satellite facility established pursuant to subdivision (c).